Utah statutes.
11-25-14.   Trust to secure bonds -- Contents of agreement or bond
resolution -- Indemnity bonds or securities -- Expenses of trust.
In the discretion of the agency, any bonds issued under the provisions of this
part may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the agency and a
corporate trustee or trustees, which may be any trust company or bank having
the powers of a trust company within or without this state. The trust
agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of bonds may pledge or
assign the revenues to be received or proceeds of any contract or contracts
pledged, and may convey or mortgage any residence the rehabilitation of which
is to be financed out of the proceeds of the bonds. Such trust agreement or
resolution providing for the issuance of bonds may contain such provisions for
protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be
reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including such provisions
as may be included in any resolution or resolutions of the agency authorizing
the issuance of bonds. Any bank or trust company doing business under the laws
of this state which may act as depositary of the proceeds of bonds or of
revenues or other money may furnish such indemnity bonds or pledge such
securities as may be required by the agency. Any trust agreement may set forth
the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee or trustees, and
may restrict the individual rights of action by bondholders. In addition to
the foregoing, any trust agreement or resolution may contain such other
provisions as the agency may deem reasonable and proper for the security of
the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of the
trust agreement or resolution may be created as a part of the cost of
residential rehabilitation.
